Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.29, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.29. Any United States Attorney or Assistant United


States Attorney may carry a firearm on his or her person anywhere in


the State of Oklahoma throughout this state if the person has


successfully completed a handgun qualification course for court


officials developed by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training may


provide for an identification card to be issued to the United States


Attorney or Assistant United States Attorney and may provide


application forms. If the person issued an identification card is


no longer eligible, that person shall immediately return the



Req. No. 3515 Page 1


identification card to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3515 CN 1/14/2026 2:36:50 PM







































Req. No. 3515 Page 2